Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2108
Directors and employees; interest in contracts prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any member of the board of directors or any employee thereof to have any pecuniary interest, either directly or indirectly, in any contract in connection with the construction or maintenance of water or natural gas utilities of such metropolitan utilities district or be in any way connected with the furnishing of supplies required by the district.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 11, p. 355;

R.S.1913, § 4253;

C.S.1922, § 3756;

C.S.1929, § 14-1012;

R.S.1943, § 14-1018;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1018;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 8.